Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 1
MUNICIPAL ANNEXATION ACT OF 1965

31-12-101. Short title.

This part 1 shall be known and may be cited as the "Municipal Annexation Act of 1965".

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1076, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-101 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the annexation of school districts, see § 22-30-128.

31-12-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that the policies and procedures in this part 1 are necessary and desirable for the orderly growth of urban communities in the state of Colorado, and to these ends this part 1 shall be liberally construed. The general assembly further declares that it is the purpose of this part 1:

To encourage natural and well-ordered development of municipalities of the state;

To distribute fairly and equitably the costs of municipal services among those persons who benefit therefrom;

To extend municipal government, services, and facilities to eligible areas which form a part of the whole community;

To simplify governmental structure in urban areas;

To provide an orderly system for extending municipal regulations to newly annexed areas;

To reduce friction among contiguous or neighboring municipalities; and

To increase the ability of municipalities in urban areas to provide their citizens with the services they require.

The general assembly further declares that:

Section 30 of article II of the state constitution was added to the state constitution as a voter-approved ballot measure in 1980;

Since its adoption, section 30 of article II of the state constitution has been in lawful force and effect. As part of the state constitution, all annexations since its enactment have been or should have been undertaken subject to its terms.

By enacting House Bill 10-1259, enacted in 2010, which amends various provisions of this part 1, the general assembly does not intend to change the law governing annexations in the state but rather to better harmonize the provisions of this part 1 with those of section 30 of article II of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1076, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(2) added, (HB 10-1259), ch. 211, p. 913, § 1, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-102 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-103. Definitions.

As used in this part 1, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Adult" means any person who has attained his twenty-first birthday.

"Agricultural land" means land used for the growing of crops, truck gardening, the grazing of farm animals, and other agricultural pursuits in contrast to land used for urban development.

"Development standards" means the substantive portions of building codes, zoning ordinances, housing codes, fire district ordinances, subdivision regulations, and any other ordinance, code, or regulation relating to the construction or occupancy of buildings upon land or the preparation of such land for such construction.

"Enclave" means an unincorporated area of land entirely contained within the outer boundaries of the annexing municipality.

"Identical ownership" means a situation where each owner has exactly the same degree of interest in each separate parcel of two or more parcels of land.

"Landowner" means the owner in fee of any undivided interest in a given parcel of land. If the mineral estate has been severed, the landowner is the owner in fee of an undivided interest in the surface estate and not the owner in fee of an undivided interest in the mineral estate.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (HB 10-1259), ch. 211, p. 913, § 2, effective August 11, 2010.)

"Period of notice for hearing" means the time between the effective date of the resolution establishing the hearing date and the date when such hearing first commences.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (HB 10-1259), ch. 211, p. 913, § 2, effective August 11, 2010.)

"Quasi-municipal corporation" means a corporation vested with the municipal powers for the accomplishment of a limited municipal purpose, including but not limited to domestic water districts, metropolitan districts, sanitation districts, water and sanitation districts, fire protection districts, recreation districts, and disposal districts.

(10.5) "Registered elector" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 1-1-104 (35), C.R.S.

"Resident" means one who makes his primary dwelling place within the area proposed to be annexed.

"Taxpayer" means any person who has paid or becomes liable for ad valorem taxes on real property located in the area proposed to be annexed during a specified period of time.

"Urban development" means the construction on land of improvements for residential, institutional, commercial, industrial, transportation, public flood control, and recreational and similar uses, in contrast to use of the land for growing crops, truck gardening, grazing of farm animals, and other agricultural pursuits. The term also applies to vacant ground which has been or is being prepared for urban development by such steps as subdivision into lots or plots and blocks, installation of water and sewer lines, construction of access streets, and construction of railroad spur or branch tracks.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1076, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(7) and (9) amended and (10.5) added, (HB 10-1259), ch. 211, p. 913, § 2, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-103 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-104. Eligibility for annexation.

No unincorporated area may be annexed to a municipality unless one of the conditions set forth in section 30 (1) of article II of the state constitution first has been met. An area is eligible for annexation if the provisions of section 30 of article II of the state constitution have been complied with and the governing body, at a hearing as provided in section 31-12-109, finds and determines:

That not less than one-sixth of the perimeter of the area proposed to be annexed is contiguous with the annexing municipality. Contiguity shall not be affected by the existence of a platted street or alley, a public or private right-of-way, a public or private transportation right-of-way or area, public lands, whether owned by the state, the United States, or an agency thereof, except county-owned open space, or a lake, reservoir, stream, or other natural or artificial waterway between the annexing municipality and the land proposed to be annexed. Subject to the requirements imposed by section 31-12-105 (1)(e), contiguity may be established by the annexation of one or more parcels in a series, which annexations may be completed simultaneously and considered together for the purposes of the public hearing required by sections 31-12-108 and 31-12-109 and the annexation impact report required by section 31-12-108.5.

That a community of interest exists between the area proposed to be annexed and the annexing municipality; that said area is urban or will be urbanized in the near future; and that said area is integrated with or is capable of being integrated with the annexing municipality. The fact that the area proposed to be annexed has the contiguity with the annexing municipality required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall be a basis for a finding of compliance with these requirements unless the governing body, upon the basis of competent evidence presented at the hearing provided for in section 31-12-109, finds that at least two of the following are shown to exist:

Less than fifty percent of the adult residents of the area proposed to be annexed make use of part or all of the following types of facilities of the annexing municipality: Recreational, civic, social, religious, industrial, or commercial; and less than twenty-five percent of said area's adult residents are employed in the annexing municipality. If there are no adult residents at the time of the hearing, this standard shall not apply.

One-half or more of the land in the area proposed to be annexed (including streets) is agricultural, and the landowners of such agricultural land, under oath, express an intention to devote the land to such agricultural use for a period of not less than five years.

It is not physically practicable to extend to the area proposed to be annexed those urban services which the annexing municipality provides in common to all of its citizens on the same terms and conditions as such services are made available to such citizens. This standard shall not apply to the extent that any portion of an area proposed to be annexed is provided or will within the reasonably near future be provided with any service by or through a quasi-municipal corporation.

The contiguity required by paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section may not be established by use of any boundary of an area which was previously annexed to the annexing municipality if the area, at the time of its annexation, was not contiguous at any point with the boundary of the annexing municipality, was not otherwise in compliance with paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section, and was located more than three miles from the nearest boundary of the annexing municipality, nor may such contiguity be established by use of any boundary of territory which is subsequently annexed directly to, or which is indirectly connected through subsequent annexations to, such an area.

Because the creation or expansion of disconnected municipal satellites, which are sought to be prohibited by this subsection (2), violates both the purposes of this article as expressed in section 31-12-102 and the limitations of this article, any annexation which uses any boundary in violation of this subsection (2) may be declared by a court of competent jurisdiction to be void ab initio in addition to other remedies which may be provided. The provisions of section 31-12-116 (2) and (4) and section 31-12-117 shall not apply to such an annexation. Judicial review of such an annexation may be sought by any municipality having a plan in place pursuant to section 31-12-105 (1)(e) directly affected by such annexation, in addition to those described in section 31-12-116 (1). Such review may be, but need not be, instituted prior to the effective date of the annexing ordinance and may include injunctive relief. Such review shall be brought no later than sixty days after the effective date of the annexing ordinance or shall forever be barred.

Contiguity is hereby declared to be a fundamental element in any annexation, and this subsection (2) shall not in any way be construed as having the effect of legitimizing in any way any noncontiguous annexation.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1078, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1218, § 1, effective May 28.

L. 91:

(2) added, p. 763, § 1, effective May 15.

L. 2010:

IP(1) amended, (HB 10-1259), ch. 211, p. 914, § 3, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-104 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For annexation of unincorporated areas, see § 30 of article II of the state constitution.

31-12-105. Limitations.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this part 1 to the contrary, the following limitations shall apply to all annexations:

In establishing the boundaries of any territory to be annexed, no land held in identical ownership, whether consisting of one tract or parcel of real estate or two or more contiguous tracts or parcels of real estate, shall be divided into separate parts or parcels without the written consent of the landowners thereof unless such tracts or parcels are separated by a dedicated street, road, or other public way.

In establishing the boundaries of any area proposed to be annexed, no land held in identical ownership, whether consisting of one tract or parcel of real estate or two or more contiguous tracts or parcels of real estate, comprising twenty acres or more (which, together with the buildings and improvements situated thereon has a valuation for assessment in excess of two hundred thousand dollars for ad valorem tax purposes for the year next preceding the annexation) shall be included under this part 1 without the written consent of the landowners unless such tract of land is situated entirely within the outer boundaries of the annexing municipality as they exist at the time of annexation. In the application of this paragraph (b), contiguity shall not be affected by a dedicated street, road, or other public way.

No annexation pursuant to section 31-12-106 and no annexation petition or petition for an annexation election pursuant to section 31-12-107 shall be valid when annexation proceedings have been commenced for the annexation of part or all of such territory to another municipality, except in accordance with the provisions of section 31-12-114. For the purpose of this section, proceedings are commenced when the petition is filed with the clerk of the annexing municipality or when the resolution of intent is adopted by the governing body of the annexing municipality if action on the acceptance of such petition or on the resolution of intent by the setting of the hearing in accordance with section 31-12-108 is taken within ninety days after the said filings if an annexation procedure initiated by petition for annexation is then completed within the one hundred fifty days next following the effective date of the resolution accepting the petition and setting the hearing date and if an annexation procedure initiated by resolution of intent or by petition for an annexation election is prosecuted without unreasonable delay after the effective date of the resolution setting the hearing date.

As to any annexation which will result in the detachment of area from any school district and the attachment of the same to another school district, no annexation pursuant to section 31-12-106 or annexation petition or petition for an annexation election pursuant to section 31-12-107 is valid unless accompanied by a resolution of the board of directors of the school district to which such area will be attached approving such annexation.

Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (e), no annexation may take place that would have the effect of extending a municipal boundary more than three miles in any direction from any point of such municipal boundary in any one year. Within said three-mile area, the contiguity required by section 31-12-104 (1)(a) may be achieved by annexing a platted street or alley, a public or private right-of-way, a public or private transportation right-of-way or area, or a lake, reservoir, stream, or other natural or artificial waterway. Prior to completion of any annexation within the three-mile area, the municipality shall have in place a plan for that area that generally describes the proposed location, character, and extent of streets, subways, bridges, waterways, waterfronts, parkways, playgrounds, squares, parks, aviation fields, other public ways, grounds, open spaces, public utilities, and terminals for water, light, sanitation, transportation, and power to be provided by the municipality and the proposed land uses for the area. Such plan shall be updated at least once annually. Such three-mile limit may be exceeded if such limit would have the effect of dividing a parcel of property held in identical ownership if at least fifty percent of the property is within the three-mile limit. In such event, the entire property held in identical ownership may be annexed in any one year without regard to such mileage limitation. Such three-mile limit may also be exceeded for the annexation of an enterprise zone.

Prior to completion of an annexation in which the contiguity required by section 31-12-104 (1)(a) is achieved pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (e), the municipality shall annex any of the following parcels that abut a platted street or alley, a public or private right-of-way, a public or private transportation right-of-way or area, or a lake, reservoir, stream, or other natural or artificial waterway, where the parcel satisfies all of the eligibility requirements pursuant to section 31-12-104 and for which an annexation petition has been received by the municipality no later than forty-five days prior to the date of the hearing set pursuant to section 31-12-108 (1):

Any parcel of property that has an individual schedule number for county tax filing purposes upon the petition of the owner of such parcel;

Any subdivision that consists of only one subdivision filing upon the petition of the requisite number of property owners within the subdivision as determined pursuant to section 31-12-107; and

Any subdivision filing within a subdivision that consists of more than one subdivision filing upon the petition of the requisite number of property owners within the subdivision filing as determined pursuant to section 31-12-107.

The parcels described in subparagraph (II) of paragraph (e) of this subsection (1) shall be annexed under the same or substantially similar terms and conditions and considered at the same hearing and in the same impact report as the initial annexation in which the contiguity required by section 31-12-104 (1)(a) is achieved by annexing a platted street or alley, a public or private right-of-way, a public or private transportation right-of-way or area, or a lake, reservoir, stream, or other natural or artificial waterway. Impacts of the annexation upon the parcels described in subparagraph (II) of paragraph (e) of this subsection (1) that abut such platted street or alley, public or private right-of-way, public or private transportation right-of-way or area, or lake, reservoir, stream, or other natural or artificial waterway shall be considered in the impact report required by section 31-12-108.5. As part of the same hearing, the municipality shall consider and decide upon any petition for annexation of any parcel of property having an individual schedule number for county tax filing purposes, which petition was received not later than forty-five days prior to the hearing date, where the parcel abuts any parcel described in subparagraph (II) of paragraph (e) of this subsection (1) and where the parcel otherwise satisfies all of the eligibility requirements of section 31-12-104.

In connection with any annexation in which the contiguity required by section 31-12-104 (1)(a) is achieved by annexing a platted street or alley, a public or private right-of-way, a public or private transportation right-of-way or area, or a lake, reservoir, stream, or other natural or artificial waterway, upon the latter of ninety days prior to the date of the hearing set pursuant to section 31-12-108 or upon the filing of the annexation petition, the municipality shall provide, by regular mail to the owner of any abutting parcel as reflected in the records of the county assessor, written notice of the annexation and of the landowner's right to petition for annexation pursuant to section 31-12-107. Inadvertent failure to provide such notice shall neither create a cause of action in favor of any landowner nor invalidate any annexation proceeding.

In establishing the boundaries of any area proposed to be annexed, if a portion of a platted street or alley is annexed, the entire width of said street or alley shall be included within the area annexed.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (f) of this subsection (1), a municipality shall not deny reasonable access to landowners, owner of an easement, or the owner of a franchise adjoining a platted street or alley which has been annexed by the municipality but is not bounded on both sides by the municipality.

The execution by any municipality of a power of attorney for real estate located within an unincorporated area shall not be construed to comply with the election provisions of this article for purposes of annexing such unincorporated area. Such annexation shall be valid only upon compliance with the procedures set forth in this article.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1078, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1)(e) to (1)(g) added, p. 1218, § 2, effective May 28.

L. 96:

(1)(h) added, p. 1770, § 69, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1)(c) and (1)(d) amended, p. 994, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 2001, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

(1)(e) amended and (1)(e.1) and (1)(e.3) added, p. 32, § 2, effective November 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-105 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-106. Annexation of enclaves, partly surrounded land, and municipally owned land.

Annexation of enclaves. When any unincorporated area is entirely contained within the boundaries of a municipality, the governing body may by ordinance annex such territory to the municipality in accordance with section 30 (1)(c) of article II of the state constitution, but without complying with section 31-12-104, 31-12-105, 31-12-108, or 31-12-109, if said area has been so surrounded for a period of not less than three years; except that notice of the proposed annexation ordinance shall be given by publication as provided by section 31-12-108 (2) for notices of annexation petitions, and resolutions initiating annexation proceedings, but no public hearing on the proposed annexation ordinance shall be required, and the first publication of notice shall be at least thirty days prior to the adoption of the ordinance.

(1.1) Exception to annexation of enclaves.

No enclave may be annexed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if:

Any part of the municipal boundary or territory surrounding such enclave consists at the time of the annexation of the enclave of public rights-of-way, including streets and alleys, that are not immediately adjacent to the municipality on the side of the right-of-way opposite to the enclave; or

Any part of the territory surrounding the enclave was annexed to the municipality since December 19, 1980, without compliance with section 30 of article II of the state constitution.

In the case of an enclave the population of which exceeds one hundred persons according to the most recent United States census and that contains more than fifty acres, the enclave shall not be annexed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section unless the governing body of the annexing municipality has:

Created an annexation transition committee composed of nine members, five of whom shall reside, operate a business, or own real property within the enclave, two of whom shall represent the annexing municipality, and two of whom shall represent one or more counties in which the enclave is situated; and

Published notice of the creation and existence of the committee, together with its regular mail, electronic mail, or telephonic contact information, in the same manner as provided by section 31-12-108 (2) for notices of annexation petitions and resolutions initiating annexation proceedings.

The duties of the annexation transition committee required by paragraph (b) of this subsection (1.1) shall be to:

Serve as a means of communication between or among the annexing municipality, one or more counties within which the enclave is situated, and the persons who reside, operate a business, or own real property within the enclave regarding any public meetings on the proposed annexation; and

Provide a mechanism by which persons who reside, operate a business, or own real property within the enclave may communicate, whether by electronic mail, telephonic communication, regular mail, or public meetings, with the annexing municipality or any counties within which the enclave is situated regarding the proposed annexation.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 97, p. 995, § 2, effective May 27, 1997.)

Annexation of unincorporated municipally owned land. When the municipality is the sole owner of the area that it desires to annex, which area is eligible for annexation in accordance with section 30 (1)(c) of article II of the state constitution and sections 31-12-104 (1)(a) and 31-12-105, the governing body may by ordinance annex said area to the municipality without notice and hearing as provided in sections 31-12-108 and 31-12-109. The annexing ordinance shall state that the area proposed to be annexed is owned by the annexing municipality and is not solely a public street or right-of-way.

Additional terms and conditions on the annexation. Additional terms or conditions may be imposed by the governing body in accordance with section 31-12-112.

Any municipality that has entered into an intergovernmental agreement, any portion of which addresses issues pertaining to the annexation of enclaves shall, promptly upon execution of the agreement, record the agreement with the clerk and recorder of any county within which any land area addressed in the agreement is situated.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1079, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1) amended and (1.1) added, p. 1510, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1.1) and (2) amended, p. 995, § 2, effective May 27.

L. 2006:

(1.1) amended and (5) added, p. 1007, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2010:

(1) and (3) amended, (HB 10-1259), ch. 211, p. 914, § 4, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-106 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For annexation of unincorporated areas, see § 30 of article II of the state constitution.

31-12-107. Petitions for annexation and for annexation elections.

Petition for annexation in accordance with section 30 (1)(b) of article II of the state constitution:

Persons comprising more than fifty percent of the landowners in the area and owning more than fifty percent of the area, excluding public streets and alleys and any land owned by the annexing municipality, meeting the requirements of sections 31-12-104 and 31-12-105 may petition the governing body of any municipality for the annexation of such territory.

The petition shall be filed with the clerk.

The petition shall contain the following:

An allegation that it is desirable and necessary that such area be annexed to the municipality;

An allegation that the requirements of sections 31-12-104 and 31-12-105 exist or have been met;

An allegation that the signers of the petition comprise more than fifty percent of the landowners in the area and own more than fifty percent of the area proposed to be annexed, excluding public streets and alleys and any land owned by the annexing municipality;

A request that the annexing municipality approve the annexation of the area proposed to be annexed;

The signatures of such landowners;

The mailing address of each such signer;

The legal description of the land owned by such signer;

The date of signing of each signature; and

The affidavit of each circulator of such petition, whether consisting of one or more sheets, that each signature therein is the signature of the person whose name it purports to be.

Accompanying the petition shall be four copies of an annexation map containing the following information:

A written legal description of the boundaries of the area proposed to be annexed;

A map showing the boundary of the area proposed to be annexed;

Within the annexation boundary map, a showing of the location of each ownership tract in unplatted land and, if part or all of the area is platted, the boundaries and the plat numbers of plots or of lots and blocks;

Next to the boundary of the area proposed to be annexed, a drawing of the contiguous boundary of the annexing municipality and the contiguous boundary of any other municipality abutting the area proposed to be annexed.

No signature on the petition is valid if it is dated more than one hundred eighty days prior to the date of filing the petition for annexation with the clerk. All petitions which substantially comply with the requirements set forth in paragraphs (b) to (d) of this subsection (1) shall be deemed sufficient. No person signing a petition for annexation shall be permitted to withdraw his signature from the petition after the petition has been filed with the clerk, except as such right of withdrawal is otherwise set forth in the petition.

The clerk shall refer the petition to the governing body as a communication. The governing body, without undue delay, shall then take appropriate steps to determine if the petition so filed is substantially in compliance with this subsection (1).

If the petition is found to be in substantial compliance with this subsection (1), the procedure outlined in sections 31-12-108 to 31-12-110 shall then be followed. If it is not in substantial compliance, no further action shall be taken.

Petition for annexation election in accordance with section 30 (1)(a) of article II of the state constitution:

The registered electors may petition the governing body of any municipality to commence proceedings for the holding of an annexation election in the area proposed to be annexed. This petition shall meet the standards described in paragraphs (c) and (d) of this subsection (2) and either:

Shall be signed by at least seventy-five registered electors or ten percent of said electors, whichever is less, if such area is located in a county of more than twenty-five thousand inhabitants; or

Shall be signed by at least forty registered electors or ten percent of said electors, whichever is less, if such area is located in a county of twenty-five thousand inhabitants or less.

The petition shall be filed with the clerk.

The petition for annexation election shall comply with the provisions of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section; except that:

Rather than an allegation of any certain percentage of land owned, it shall contain an allegation that the signers of the petition are qualified electors resident in and landowners of the area proposed to be annexed; and

The petition shall request the annexing municipality to commence proceedings for the holding of an annexation election in accordance with section 30 (1)(a) of article II of the state constitution.

The requirements and procedures provided for in paragraphs (e) and (f) of subsection (1) of this section shall be met and followed in a proceeding under this subsection (2).

If the petition is found to be in substantial compliance with this subsection (2), the procedure outlined in sections 31-12-108 to 31-12-110 shall then be followed, subject thereafter to an annexation election to be held in accordance with section 31-12-112. If the petition for an annexation election is not found to be in substantial compliance, no further action shall be taken; except that the governing body shall make such determination by resolution.

Procedures alternative: The procedures set forth in subsections (1) and (2) of this section are alternative to each other and to any procedure set forth in section 31-12-106; except that a petition for annexation election filed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall take precedence over an annexation petition involving the same territory and filed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if such petition for annexation election is filed at least ten days prior to the hearing date set for the annexation petition filed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Additional terms and conditions on the annexation: Additional terms and conditions may be imposed by the governing body in accordance with section 31-12-112.

If a petition is filed pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section and the territory sought to be annexed meets the specifications of section 31-12-106 (1), the governing body of the municipality with which the petition is filed shall thereupon initiate annexation proceedings pursuant to the appropriate provisions of section 31-12-106 (1). In the event that any governing body fails to initiate such annexation proceedings within a period of one year from the time that such petition is filed, annexation may be effected by an action in the nature of mandamus to the district court of the county where the land to be annexed is located, and the petitioner's court costs and attorney fees incident to such action shall be borne by the municipality.

No proceedings for annexation to a municipality may be initiated in any area which is the same or substantially the same area in which an election for annexation to the same municipality has been held within the preceding twelve months.

For the purpose of determining the compliance with the petition requirements in this section, a signature by any landowner shall be sufficient so long as any other owner in fee of an undivided interest in the same area of land does not object in writing to the governing body of the annexing municipality within fourteen days after the filing of the petition for annexation or annexation election. The entire area of the land signed for shall be computed as petitioning for annexation if such signing landowner has become liable for taxes in the last preceding calendar year or is exempt by law from payment of taxes. One who is purchasing land under a written contract duly recorded shall be deemed the owner of the land which is subject to the contract if he has paid the taxes thereon for the next preceding tax year. The signers for an area owned by a corporation, whether profit or nonprofit, shall be the same persons as those authorized to convey land for such corporation.

No power of attorney providing the consent of a landowner to be annexed by a municipality pursuant to this section shall be valid for a term of more than five years, and no such power of attorney executed before May 27, 1997, shall be valid for a term of more than five years after May 27, 1997.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1080, § 1, effective July 1; (1)(d)(IV) amended, p. 1452, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1)(e) and (1)(g) amended, p. 1219, § 3, effective May 28.

L. 97:

(5) amended and (8) added, p. 995, § 3, effective May 27.

L. 2010:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(c)(III), (1)(g), IP(2), (2)(a), (2)(c)(II), and (2)(e) amended, (HB 10-1259), ch. 211, p. 914, § 5, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 31-8-103 and 31-8-107 as they existed prior to 1975.

31-12-108. Setting hearing date - notice given.

As a part of the resolution initiating annexation proceedings by the municipality or of a resolution finding substantial compliance of an annexation petition or of a petition for an annexation election, the governing body of the annexing municipality shall establish a date, time, and place that the governing body will hold a hearing to determine if the proposed annexation complies with section 30 of article II of the state constitution and sections 31-12-104 and 31-12-105 or such provisions thereof as may be required to establish eligibility under the terms of this part 1. The hearing shall be held not less than thirty days nor more than sixty days after the effective date of the resolution setting the hearing. This hearing need not be held if the municipality has determined conclusively that the requirements of section 30 of article II of the state constitution and sections 31-12-104 and 31-12-105 have not been met.

The clerk shall give notice as follows: A copy of the resolution or the petition as filed (exclusive of the signatures) together with a notice that, on the given date and at the given time and place set by the governing body, the governing body shall hold a hearing upon said resolution of the annexing municipality or upon the petition for the purpose of determining and finding whether the area proposed to be annexed meets the applicable requirements of section 30 of article II of the state constitution and sections 31-12-104 and 31-12-105 and is considered eligible for annexation. Said notice shall be published once a week for four successive weeks in some newspaper of general circulation in the area proposed to be annexed. The first publication of such notice shall be at least thirty days prior to the date of the hearing. The proof of publication of the notice and resolution or petition, or the summary thereof, shall be returned when the publication is completed, the certificate of the owner, editor, or manager of the newspaper in which said notice is published shall be proof thereof, and a hearing shall then be held as provided in said notice. A copy of the published notice, together with a copy of the resolution and petition as filed, shall also be sent by registered mail by the clerk to the board of county commissioners and to the county attorney of the county wherein the territory is located and to any special district or school district having territory within the area to be annexed at least twenty-five days prior to the date fixed for such hearing. The notice required to be sent to the special district or school district by this subsection (2) shall not confer any right of review in addition to those rights provided for in section 31-12-116.

The governing body of the annexing municipality, from time to time, may continue the hearing to another date without additional notice if the volume of material to be received cannot be presented within the available time for any given session; except that no session of a hearing shall be so continued unless at least one hour of testimony has been heard.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1083, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(2) amended, p. 1220, § 4, effective May 28.

L. 2010:

(1) and (2) amended, (HB 10-1259), ch. 211, p. 916, § 6, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-108 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-108.5. Annexation impact report - requirements.

The municipality shall prepare an impact report concerning the proposed annexation at least twenty-five days before the date of the hearing established pursuant to section 31-12-108 and shall file one copy with the board of county commissioners governing the area proposed to be annexed within five days thereafter. Such report shall not be required for annexations of ten acres or less in total area or when the municipality and the board of county commissioners governing the area proposed to be annexed agree that the report may be waived. Such report shall include, as a minimum:

A map or maps of the municipality and adjacent territory to show the following information:

The present and proposed boundaries of the municipality in the vicinity of the proposed annexation;

The present streets, major trunk water mains, sewer interceptors and outfalls, other utility lines and ditches, and the proposed extension of such streets and utility lines in the vicinity of the proposed annexation; and

The existing and proposed land use pattern in the areas to be annexed;

A copy of any draft or final preannexation agreement, if available;

A statement setting forth the plans of the municipality for extending to or otherwise providing for, within the area to be annexed, municipal services performed by or on behalf of the municipality at the time of annexation;

A statement setting forth the method under which the municipality plans to finance the extension of the municipal services into the area to be annexed;

A statement identifying existing districts within the area to be annexed; and

A statement on the effect of annexation upon local-public school district systems, including the estimated number of students generated and the capital construction required to educate such students.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 1220, § 5, effective May 28.